dictionaries/isv_latcyr_hunspell_dict.dic
уполномочевати/Iu
метеоролог/Iv
вуголј/Iw
какы/Ix
боз/Iy
три/Iz
собрати/JA
новости/JB
југ/JC
дрети/JD
уста/JE
тутој/JF
јагне/JG
дрождже/JH
клєшче/JH
вес/JI
израсти/JJ
европејскы/Ix
европскы/Ix
врата/JE
идеолог/Iv
тамтој/JF
завојевати/Iu
бојевати/Iu
еколог/Iv
кторы/Ix
луксембург/JC
бог/Iv
четыри/Iz
тој/JF
двери/JB
расти/JJ
ночевати/Iu
биолог/Iv
прєночевати/Iu
археолог/Iv
невролог/Iv
дєти/JB
малјевати/Iu
ножице/JH
војевати/Iu
јихны/Ix
двојчета/JE
прєрасти/JJ
супруг/Iv
вєсти/JB
враг/Iv
зарасти/JJ
друг/Iv
јетра/JE
лєта/JE
теле/JG
шестерчета/JE
тројчета/JE
прасе/JG
жрєбе/JG
дорасти/JJ
возрасти/JJ
четверчета/JE
петерчета/JE
тројны/Ix
четверны/Ix
петерны/Ix
шестерны/Ix
двојакы/Ix
тројакы/Ix
четверакы/Ix
петеракы/Ix
шестеракы/Ix
гуслје/JH
психолог/Iv
финанције/JH
хирург/Iv
кате/JG
срасти/JJ
смети/JB
теолог/Iv
оној/JF
једнорог/Iv
околице/JH
раздрети/JD
танцевати/Iu
носорог/Iv
внутрности/JB
астролог/Iv
ногавице/JH
папуче/JH
радиолог/Iv
геолог/Iv
педагог/Iv
поструг/Iv
социолог/Iv
узбечскы/Ix
узбекскы/Ix
казахскы/Ix
казашскы/Ix
таджичскы/Ix
таджикскы/Ix
порасти/JJ
дрва/JE
грабје/JH
гусе/JG
јелене/JG
кабаре/JG
коте/JG
козорог/Iv
лјве/JG
лисе/JG
младе/JG
нарасти/JJ
обојакы/Ix
обрасти/JJ
обсег/JC
оддрети/JD
орле/JG
осле/JG
разрасти/JJ
вакације/JH
валјцевати/Iu
варјаг/Iv
викинг/Iv
зоолог/Iv
виролог/Iv
шчене/JG
пингпонг/JC
обдрети/JD
сдрети/JD
кириличскы/Ix
кирилскы/Ix
бичевати/Iu
понєкторы/Ix
наочила/JE
глаголскы/Ix
дистанцевати/Iu
продрети/JD
осмоног/Iv
аранжевати/Iu
санје/JH
зимбабве/JG
линчевати/Iu
